Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-504
Applicant;
eligibility; preference.

(1) To be eligible for funds under
the program, an applicant shall:

(a) Be a graduate of an approved
veterinary medical school;

(b) Be licensed to practice veterinary
medicine in this state;

(c) Enter into a contract with the department
to provide full-time veterinary medicine services as a food supply animal
veterinarian in a food supply animal veterinary practice or in a rural mixed
animal veterinary practice for four years in one or more communities approved
by the department; and

(d) Be accredited by the United States
Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, Veterinary
Services to provide services relating to food supply animals by the end of
the first year of service.

(2) The department shall give preference
for approving communities for purposes of subdivision (1)(c) of this section
to communities located in areas designated by the department as shortage areas
for food supply animal veterinary medical services. In designating such areas,
the department may initially utilize shortage areas as designated by the American
Veterinary Medical Association on July 18, 2008, and may revise designations
as necessary and appropriate to achieve the purposes of the program.

Laws
2008, LB1172, § 4.